Illinois, session 104th, SB2579.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Illinois 7Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security 8for the objects and purposes hereinafter named:9MANAGEMENT AND ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT10Payable from Radiation Protection Fund: 11  For Personal Services...............................243,40012  For State Contributions to State13   Employees' Retirement System.......................124,10014  For State Contributions to Social Security...........18,70015  For Group Insurance..................................99,60016  For Contractual Services..........................1,866,50017  For Travel............................................1,70018  For Commodities......................................17,60019  For Equipment........................................24,80020  For Electronic Data Processing....................2,086,50021  For Telecommunication Services.......................13,50022    Total                                          $4,496,40023Payable from Nuclear Safety Emergency   SB2579- 2 -OMB104 00112 PRA 10112 b1 Preparedness Fund:2  For Contractual Services..........................4,941,3003  For Travel...........................................30,8004  For Commodities......................................72,0005  For Printing.........................................18,0006  For Equipment.......................................301,4007  For Electronic Data Processing....................5,418,4008  For Telecommunication Services......................143,5009  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................348,10010    Total                                         $11,273,500 11    Section 10. In addition to other amounts appropriated, the 12amount of $15,147,500, or so much thereof as may be necessary, 13is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the Illinois 14Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security 15for costs and expenses associated with operational expenses. 16    Section 15. The sum of $114,000, or so much thereof as may 17be necessary, is appropriated from the Radiation Protection 18Fund to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 19Homeland Security for the ordinary and contingent expenses 20incurred by the Agency. 21    Section 20. The sum of $500,000,000, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, is appropriated from the Disaster Response 23and Recovery Fund to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency   SB2579- 3 -OMB104 00112 PRA 10112 b1and Office of Homeland Security for expenses associated with 2disaster response and recovery, including prior years' costs. 3    Section 25. The sum of $125,500, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary, is appropriated from the Nuclear Safety 5Emergency Preparedness Fund to the Illinois Emergency 6Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security for the 7ordinary and contingent expenses incurred by the Agency. 8    Section 30. The following named amounts, or so much 9thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Illinois 10Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security 11for the objects and purposes hereinafter named:12OPERATIONS13Payable from Nuclear Safety Emergency 14 Preparedness Fund:15  For Personal Services............................1,127,200 16  For State Contributions to State17   Employees' Retirement System.......................568,10018  For State Contributions to Social Security...........85,10019  For Group Insurance.................................365,20020  For Contractual Services............................255,90021  For Travel..........................................119,70022  For Commodities......................................31,30023  For Printing..........................................3,00024  For Equipment.......................................376,100  SB2579- 4 -OMB104 00112 PRA 10112 b1  For Telecommunication Services......................504,7002  For Operation of Auto Equipment...........................03    Total                                          $3,436,300 4    Section 35. The amount of $100,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 7Homeland Security for all costs associated with the Illinois 8Civilian Cyber Auxiliary. 9    Section 40. The amount of $1,500,000, or so much thereof 10as may be necessary, is appropriated from the IEMA State 11Projects Fund to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 12Office of Homeland Security for the purposes of conducting a 13Mississippi Water Commission Southwest Illinois Levee Systems 14Study. 15    Section 45. The amount of $100,000, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, is appropriated from the Emergency Planning 17and Training Fund to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 18and Office of Homeland Security for costs associated with the 19Safety and Aid for the Environment in Carbon Capture and 20Sequestration Act (SAFE CCS). 21    Section 50. The amount of $2,000,000, or so much thereof 22as may be necessary, is appropriated from the IEMA State   SB2579- 5 -OMB104 00112 PRA 10112 b1Projects Fund to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 2Office of Homeland Security for the purposes of planning and 3developing a statewide emergency broadcast system. 4    Section 55. The following named amounts, or so much 5thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 6the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 7Homeland Security for the objects and purposes hereinafter 8enumerated:9RADIATION SAFETY10Payable from Radiation Protection Fund:11  For Personal Services.............................4,138,90012  For State Contributions to State13   Employees' Retirement System.....................2,109,50014  For State Contributions to15   Social Security....................................316,70016  For Group Insurance...............................1,228,40017  For Contractual Services............................308,60018  For Travel...........................................92,10019  For Commodities......................................68,80020  For Equipment.......................................483,00021  For Telecommunication Services.......................57,20022  For Refunds..........................................35,00023    Total                                          $8,838,20024Payable from Nuclear Safety Emergency 25 Preparedness Fund:  SB2579- 6 -OMB104 00112 PRA 10112 b1  For Personal Services.............................7,425,0002  For State Contributions to State3   Employees' Retirement System.....................3,784,3004  For State Contributions to5   Social Security....................................568,1006  For Group Insurance...............................2,068,4007  For Contractual Services..........................2,853,8008  For Travel..........................................238,5009  For Commodities.....................................279,40010  For Printing.........................................12,00011  For Equipment.....................................2,085,40012  For Telecommunication Services......................261,80013    Total                                         $19,576,700 14    Section 60. The sum of $525,000, or so much thereof as may 15be necessary, is appropriated from the Radiation Protection 16Fund to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 17Homeland Security for licensing facilities where radioactive 18uranium and thorium mill tailings are generated or located, 19and related costs for regulating the decontamination and 20decommissioning of such facilities and for identification, 21decontamination, and environmental monitoring of unlicensed 22properties contaminated with such radioactive mill tailings. 23    Section 65. The sum of $60,000, or so much thereof as may 24be necessary, is appropriated from the Radiation Protection   SB2579- 7 -OMB104 00112 PRA 10112 b1Fund to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 2Homeland Security for all expenses related to solid hazardous 3waste remediation, including prior years' costs, at the Ottawa 4Radiation Areas Superfund site in LaSalle County, Illinois. 5    Section 70. The sum of $100,000, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated from the Radiation Protection 7Fund to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 8Homeland Security for recovery and remediation of radioactive 9materials and contaminated facilities or properties when such 10expenses cannot be paid by a responsible person or an 11available surety. 12    Section 75. The amount of $1,250,000, or so much thereof 13as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Indoor Radon 14Mitigation Fund to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 15and Office of Homeland Security for expenses relating to the 16federally funded State Indoor Radon Abatement Program, 17including prior years' costs. 18    Section 80. The amount of $63,000, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, is appropriated from the Nuclear Safety 20Emergency Preparedness Fund to the Illinois Emergency 21Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security for related 22training and travel expenses and to reimburse the Illinois 23State Police and the Illinois Commerce Commission for costs   SB2579- 8 -OMB104 00112 PRA 10112 b1incurred for activities related to inspecting and escorting 2shipments of spent nuclear fuel, high-level radioactive waste, 3and transuranic waste in Illinois as provided under the rules 4of the Agency. 5    Section 85. The sum of $275,000, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated from the Sheffield February 1982 7Agreed Order Fund to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 8and Office of Homeland Security for the care, maintenance, 9monitoring, testing, remediation, and insurance of the 10low-level radioactive waste disposal site near Sheffield, 11Illinois. 12    Section 90. The sum of $650,000, or so much thereof as may 13be necessary, is appropriated from the Nuclear Safety 14Emergency Preparedness Fund to the Illinois Emergency 15Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security for 16compensation to local governments for expenses attributable to 17implementation and maintenance of plans and programs 18authorized by Section 4 of the Nuclear Safety Preparedness 19Act. 20    Section 95. The sum of $650,000, or so much thereof as may 21be necessary, is appropriated from the Low-Level Radioactive 22Waste Facility and Operation Fund to the Illinois Emergency 23Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security for use in   SB2579- 9 -OMB104 00112 PRA 10112 b1accordance with Section 14 of the Illinois Low-Level 2Radioactive Waste Management Act for costs related to 3establishing a low-level radioactive waste disposal facility. 4    Section 100. The following named amounts, or so much 5thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Illinois 6Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security 7for the objects and purposes hereinafter named:8PREPAREDNESS AND GRANTS ADMINISTRATION9Payable from Nuclear Safety Emergency  10 Preparedness Fund:11  For Contractual Services.............................31,00012  For Travel...........................................21,80013  For Commodities.......................................9,50014  For Equipment.......................................270,00015  For Telecommunication Services......................278,80016    Total                                            $611,100 17    Section 105. The sum of $10,000,000, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 19Fund to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 20Homeland Security for all costs associated with homeland 21security and emergency preparedness and response, including 22grants and operational expenses. 23    Section 110. The amount of $500,000, or so much thereof as   SB2579- 10 -OMB104 00112 PRA 10112 b1may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 2Fund to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 3Homeland Security for all costs and expenses related to the 4Office of Homeland Security. 5    Section 115. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 8Homeland Security for deposit into the IEMA State Projects 9Fund for grants and operational expenses associated with the 10administration of the Illinois' Not-for-Profit Security Grant 11Program, pursuant to Subsection g-5 of Section 5 of the 12Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. 13    Section 120. The amount of $126,000, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated from the Emergency Planning 15and Training Fund to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 16and Office of Homeland Security for activities as a result of 17the Illinois Emergency Planning and Community Right To Know 18Act. 19    Section 125. The amount of $918,100,000, or so much 20thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal 21Aid Disaster Fund to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 22and Office of Homeland Security for State administration of 23the Federal Disaster Public Assistance Program, including   SB2579- 11 -OMB104 00112 PRA 10112 b1prior years' costs. 2    Section 130. The amount of $252,000,000, or so much 3thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal 4Aid Disaster Fund to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 5and Office of Homeland Security for all costs related to 6federal disaster mitigation programs, Flood Mitigation 7Assistance, and Disaster Case Management, including prior 8years' costs. 9    Section 135. The amount of $2,732,400, or so much thereof 10as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Civil 11Preparedness Administrative Fund to the Illinois Emergency 12Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security for 13Hazardous Material Emergency Preparedness including prior 14years' costs. 15    Section 140. The amount of $500,000, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, is appropriated from the September 11th Fund 17to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 18Homeland Security for grants, contracts, and administrative 19expenses pursuant to Section 3-660 of the Illinois Vehicle 20Code, including prior years' costs. 21    Section 145. The amount of $43,000,000, or so much thereof 22as may be necessary, is appropriated from the IEMA State   SB2579- 12 -OMB104 00112 PRA 10112 b1Projects Fund to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 2Office of Homeland Security for grants and operational 3expenses associated with the administration of the Illinois' 4Not-for-Profit Security Grant Program, pursuant to Subsection 5g-5 of Section 5 of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 6Act. 7    Section 150. The amount of $23,010,400, or so much thereof 8as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Homeland 9Security Emergency Preparedness Trust Fund to the Illinois 10Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security 11for expenses related to the federally funded Emergency 12Preparedness Grant Program, including prior years' costs. 13    Section 155. The amount of $75,017,000, or so much thereof 14as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Homeland 15Security Emergency Preparedness Trust Fund to the Illinois 16Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security 17for expenses related to Terrorism Preparedness and Training, 18including prior years' costs. 19    Section 160. The amount of $300,000,000, or so much 20thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Homeland 21Security Emergency Preparedness Trust Fund to the Illinois 22Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security 23for expenses related to administrative and preparedness   SB2579- 13 -OMB104 00112 PRA 10112 b1activities in the Chicago Urban Area, including prior years' 2costs. 3ARTICLE 24    Section 5. The sum of $51,816,860 or so much thereof as may 5be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 6on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for 7such purpose in Article 130, Section 395 of Public Act 8103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 9Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the Illinois 10Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security 11for any costs eligible for payment from Coronavirus State 12Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys in accordance with the American 13Rescue Plan Act and related federal guidance, or from any 14other federal fund pursuant to any other provision of federal 15law, including but not limited to, costs related to the 16COVID-19 pandemic response, including purchases of protective 17personal equipment, state agency health and safety measures, 18costs associated with care sites, and other emergency response 19costs, including prior years' costs, current and prior year 20operational expenses, awards, and grants of the Illinois 21Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security 22and other State agencies for the support of programs and 23services that assist people and entities impacted by the 24COVID-19 pandemic and the State's emergency response to the   SB2579- 14 -OMB104 00112 PRA 10112 b1pandemic. 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 32025.